California, session 20252026, AB2300.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14003.5 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:14003.5. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Fiscal agent” means the entity designated to serve as a local fiscal agent pursuant to Section 679.420 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations. (2)“Grant” has the same definition as “grant agreement or grant” in Section 200.1 of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3)“Subgrant” has the same definition as “subaward” in Section 200.1 of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(2) “Grants or subgrants” means allocations of both federal- and state-source funds awarded by the Employment Development Department to local workforce development boards or the fiscal agents of local workforce development areas for the purpose of implementing workforce development programs administered by the department, treated as grants or subventions for public purposes.(b) Grants or subgrants awarded by the Employment Development Department to local workforce development boards or the fiscal agents of local workforce development areas for the purpose of implementing workforce development programs administered by the department are exempt from Article 2 (commencing with Section 10295) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and are exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.(c) (1) All funds disbursed by the Employment Development Department to local workforce development boards or the fiscal agents of local workforce development areas shall be subject to the same financial reporting, recordkeeping, and auditing requirements applicable to federal funds under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA). All records related to the disbursement and expenditure of these funds shall be retained in accordance with Part 200 of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations. (2) Subrecipients shall maintain separate accounting for each state grant code and utilize the department’s automated reporting systems to ensure full accountability and transparency.(3) This section shall not be interpreted to limit any reporting, recordkeeping, or auditing requirements imposed by state law applicable to funds disbursed under this division.SEC. 2. Section 14003.7 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:14003.7. (a) Workforce directives, bulletins, or other written guidance issued by the Employment Development Department to implement, interpret, or make specific the administration of workforce development programs under this division or federal law are not subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(b) Guidance issued pursuant to this section shall be publicly available and shall identify the statutory or federal authority upon which it is based.(c) Guidance issued pursuant to this section may be relied upon by the department and local workforce development boards unless and until superseded by regulations adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.